Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 6. Virginia Guaranteed Assistance Program and Fund.

§ 23.1-636.
Virginia Guaranteed Assistance Program; Council to adopt regulations.

The Virginia Guaranteed Assistance Program is created to provide financial assistance in the form of grants to eligible students for the costs of attending a public institution of higher education. Funds may be paid to any public institution of higher education on behalf of students who have been awarded grants pursuant to §

23.1-638

.

The Council shall adopt regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this article.

History.

1992, c. 879, § 23-38.53:4; 1994, c. 789; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-637.
Virginia Guaranteed Assistance Fund.

There is created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Guaranteed Assistance Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys as may be appropriated by the General Assembly and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, or other moneys as may be received for the purposes of the Fund shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be paid to any public institution of higher education on behalf of students who have been awarded grants pursuant to the provisions of §

23.1-638

. Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall be credited to the account of the Council. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the director of the Council.

History.

1992, c. 879, § 23-38.53:5; 1994, c. 789; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-638.
Eligibility; amount of grants; renewals.

Only students who (i) are accepted for full-time enrollment at a public institution of higher education, (ii) are not receiving a Virginia Commonwealth Award, (iii) demonstrate financial need as determined by the Council, and (iv) are either (a) Virginia students who graduated from a high school in the Commonwealth with a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.5 on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent or (b) dependent children of active duty military personnel residing outside the Commonwealth pursuant to military orders, claiming Virginia on their State of Legal Residence Certificate, and satisfying the domicile requirements for such active duty military personnel pursuant to §§

23.1-502

and

23.1-504

and who graduated from a high school within or outside the Commonwealth with a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.5 on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent are eligible to receive such grants.

Each eligible student shall receive such a grant from the institution’s appropriations for undergraduate student financial assistance before Commonwealth Award grants are awarded to students with equivalent remaining need.

Each eligible student shall receive a grant in an amount greater than Commonwealth Award grants awarded to students with equivalent remaining need.

Beginning with first-time students enrolled in the fall semester in 2018, each eligible student shall receive a grant in an amount greater than the grant of each eligible student with equivalent remaining need in the next-lowest class level.

The amount of each grant shall vary according to each student’s remaining need and the total of tuition, fees, and other necessary charges, including books. The actual amount of each grant shall be determined by the proportionate award schedule adopted by each institution.

All grants shall be awarded for one award year and may be renewed annually for no more than three subsequent award years, and students shall not receive subsequent grants until they have satisfied the requirements to move to the next class level. Each recipient may receive a maximum of one year of support per class level for a maximum total of four years of support at a baccalaureate public institution of higher education and a maximum total of two years of support at an associate-degree-granting public institution of higher education, provided that in no case shall a recipient receive more than a combined total of four years of support, if the recipient:

Maintains a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.0 on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent;

Demonstrates continued financial need;

Makes satisfactory academic progress toward a degree; and

Maintains continuous full-time enrollment for not less than two semesters or three quarters in each successive award year unless the Council grants the recipient an exception for cause.

History.

1992, c. 879, § 23-38.53:6; 1993, c. 832; 1994, c. 789; 2002, c. 114; 2016, c. 588; 2017, cc. 325, 335.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 325 and 335 are identical, and added subsections B through E and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection A, substituted “full-time enrollment” for “enrollment as dependent students,” deleted “according to the congressional methodology for determining financial need and eligibility for financial aid” at the end of clause (iii), and added the reference to “23.1-502”; in the introductory paragraph of subsection F, inserted “and students shall not receive subsequent grants until they have satisfied the requirements to move to the next class level. Each recipient may receive a maximum of one year of support per class level for a maximum total of four years of support at a baccalaureate public institution of higher education and a maximum total of two years of support at an associate-degree-granting public institution of higher education, provided that in no case shall a recipient receive more than a combined total of four years of support”; deleted “earning not less than the minimum number of hours of credit required for full-time standing in each academic period during enrollment at a public institution of higher education” at the end of subdivision F 3; and inserted “full-time” in subdivision F 4.